Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201783-107.01
Department of Health and Human Services; official names of institutions under supervision.

The official names of the state institutions under the supervision of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be as follows: (1) Beatrice State Developmental Center, (2) Lincoln Regional Center, (3) Norfolk Regional Center, (4) Hastings Regional Center, (5) Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Kearney, and (6) Youth Rehabilitation and Treatment Center-Geneva.

Laws 1945, c. 250, § 1, p. 786;

Laws 1949, c. 291, § 1, p. 994;

Laws 1951, c. 318, § 1, p. 1086;

Laws 1955, c. 341, § 2, p. 1055;

Laws 1959, c. 418, § 9, p. 1403;

Laws 1959, c. 419, § 10, p. 1412;

Laws 1961, c. 416, § 12, p. 1269;

Laws 1963, c. 528, § 2, p. 1656;

Laws 1969, c. 814, § 6, p. 3061;

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 7, p. 3117;

Laws 1972, LB 1253, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 19;

Laws 1975, LB 466, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 974, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 896;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 22;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 167;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 146;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 779;

Laws 2017, LB340, § 20.
July 1, 2017
For provisions relating to the Beatrice State Developmental Center, see sections 83-217 to 83-227.02.

For provisions relating to the state hospitals for the mentally ill, see sections 83-305 to 83-357.